Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2409
Governing body, defined.

Governing body shall mean the council in the case of a city, the board of trustees in the case of a village, and the equivalent body in the case of a municipality incorporated under the laws of another state.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 9;

Laws 1987, LB 324, § 2.